algorithms/pali.sbl
externals ( stem )

stringescapes {}

stringdef a-   '{U+0101}'  // ā
stringdef i-   '{U+012B}'  // ī
stringdef u-   '{U+016B}'  // ū
stringdef m1   '{U+1E41}'  // ṁ
stringdef m2   '{U+1E43}'  // ṃ

define stem as (
  backwards (
    [substring] delete among (
        'm{a-}na' 'anta' 'onta' 'unta' 'enta' 'issa'
        'ati' '{a-}ti' 'ant' 'esi' '{a-}si' 'eti'
        'a{m1}' 'a{m2}' 'u{m1}' 'u{m2}' 'i{m1}' 'i{m2}'
        'i' '{i-}' 'a' '{a-}' 'o' 'u' '{u-}'
    )
  )
)
